Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 8
VETERANS SERVICE OFFICE AND OFFICERS

Editor's note:

This part 8 was added with relocations in 2002. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this part 8, see section 1 of chapter 121, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

28-5-801. Establishment of veterans service offices.

The board of county commissioners of each county in this state shall establish a county veterans service office and shall appoint a county veterans service officer for such county, and such board of county commissioners may also appoint any assistant and such clerical help as may be deemed necessary, each at such compensation as shall be fixed by such board, together with the necessary and actual traveling and other expenses incurred in their work as shall be approved by such board of county commissioners and such other expenses as such board may deem necessary for the proper operation of such office, payable monthly out of the county general fund in the manner provided by law. The board of county commissioners, in its discretion, may appoint any county officer, official, or employee as such county veterans service officer or as such assistant, if qualified to serve as such under the provisions of section 28-5-802, or as clerical help to such county veterans officer, at such additional compensation for such additional duties as shall be fixed by the board of county commissioners.

The boards of county commissioners of adjacent counties may act jointly in establishing a veterans service office for such counties and in appointing a veterans service officer and an assistant and such necessary clerical help as may be deemed necessary to operate such office for such counties, at such compensation as may be fixed by the joint action of the boards of county commissioners joining in the appointment of such officer and assistant and clerical help, together with the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of their work, as shall be approved by such boards of county commissioners. The salaries and expenses and all other jointly approved expenses necessary for the proper operation of such office shall be paid monthly by the boards of county commissioners out of their respective county general funds in the manner provided by law, each county bearing its share thereof in the proportion that the population of each county bears to the total population of the counties combining to establish such office.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 353, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-9-101 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-802. Qualifications - term of office.

The county veterans service officer or assistant at the time of appointment must be a resident of the state, have served in the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard, or any auxiliary branch thereof and have been honorably discharged therefrom or be a discharged LGBT veteran, or be an officer released from active duty with the armed forces and placed on inactive duty therein. Before such appointments are made, the board of county commissioners making the appointments must seek the advice and counsel of the chief officer of each post of the regularly established and existing veterans organizations of the county wherein the officer or assistant is to serve as to the qualifications and experience of the applicant for the position. The appointee must be well-qualified based on the appointee's education and experience to perform the duties of county veterans service officer. The division shall recommend education and experience qualifications for the position of county veterans service officer.

Such appointments shall be for the term of two years. At the expiration of such term or in case of a vacancy, the board of county commissioners making the appointments may either reappoint the present incumbents to the positions of county veterans service officer or assistant, or may consider new applicants and make appointments of other applicants as such county veterans service officer or assistant in the manner specified in this article.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 354, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB21-1231), ch. 206, p. 1079, § 11, effective May 28; (1) amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 176, § 12, effective November 11.

28-5-803. Duties.

It is the duty of the county veterans service officer and his or her assistant to assist any resident of the state of Colorado who is a veteran, or their surviving spouse, administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or heir of any said veteran, or any other person who may have proper claim, by the filing of claims for insurance, pensions, compensation for disability, hospitalization, vocational training, or any other benefits which such person may be or may have been entitled to receive under the laws of the United States or the state of Colorado by reason of such service.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 354, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-9-103 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-804. Cooperation with division of veterans affairs.

The county veterans service officer shall cooperate with the division of veterans affairs, its officers and employees, and other national, state, or county veterans service officers in the performance of his or her duties. He or she, on request, shall assist the division in every reasonable way, including the rendering of any reports requested by the division and the handling or processing of any veterans cases or other matters according to standard procedures established by the division in furtherance of efficient and prompt service to all veterans in the state of Colorado on a uniform basis. Such officer shall always work in the best interest of his or her clients in an attempt to maximize the amount of federal veteran benefits that they receive. Additionally, the county veterans service officer shall undertake programs and engage in activities to reduce state public assistance expenditures as directed by the division.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 354, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-9-104 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-805. Office space and supplies.

The board of county commissioners shall furnish the county veterans service officer and assistant with office space and necessary supplies.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 355, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-9-105 as it existed prior to 2002.